es: Tipo de cable de carga: Adaptador; Nivel 1; Nivel 2; Nivel 3; Otros
sv: Typ av laddningskabel: Adapter; Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Övrigt
da: Ladekableltype: Adapter; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Andet
ru: Тип зарядного кабеля: Адаптер; Уровень 1; Уровень 2; Уровень 3; Другое
pl: Typ kabla do ładowania: Adapter; Poziom 1; Poziom 2; Poziom 3; Inne
tr: Şarj kablosu türü: Adaptör; Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta kabela za punjenje: Adapter; Razina 1; Razina 2; Razina 3; Ostalo
fi: Latauskaapelityyppi: Sovitin; Taso 1; Taso 2; Taso 3; Muu
bg-BG: Тип кабел за зареждане: Адаптер; Ниво 1; Ниво 2; Ниво 3; Други
vi: Loại cáp sạc: Bộ chuyển đổi; Cấp độ 1; Cấp độ 2; Cấp độ 3; Khác
ko: 충전 케이블 유형: 어댑터; 1단계; 2단계; 3단계; 기타
it: Tipo di cavo di ricarica: Adattatore; Livello 1; Livello 2; Livello 3; Altro
lt-LT: Įkrovimo kabelio tipas: Adapteris; 1 lygis; 2 lygis; 3 lygis; Kita
fr: Type de câble de chargement: Adaptateur; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Autre
cs: Typ nabíjecího kabelu: Adaptér; Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Jiné
th: ประเภทสายชาร์จ: อะแดปเตอร์; ระดับ 1; ระดับ 2; ระดับ 3; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 充電線類型: 變壓器; 1 級; 2 級; 3 級; 其他
hu: Töltőkábel típusa: Adapter; 1. szintű; 2. szintű; 3. szintű; Egyéb
el: Τύπος καλωδίου φόρτισης: Προσαρμογέας; Επιπέδου 1; Επιπέδου 2; Επιπέδου 3; Άλλο
pt-PT: Cabo de cabo de carregamento: Adaptador; Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Outro
ro-RO: Tip cablu de încărcare: Adaptor; Nivelul 1; Nivelul 2; Nivelul 3; Altele
en: Charging cable type: Adapter; Level 1; Level 2; Level 3; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de cabo de carregamento: Adaptador; Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Outro
nb: Ladekabeltype: Adapter; Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta polnilnega kabla: Adapter; 1. stopnja; 2. stopnja; 3. stopnja; Drugo
ja: 充電ケーブルの種類: アダプター; レベル1; レベル2; レベル3; その他
zh-CN: 充电线类型: 适配器; 1 级; 2 级; 3 级; 其他
nl: Type oplaadkabel: Adapter; Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Andere
de: Ladekabeltyp: Adapter; Stufe 1; Stufe 2; Stufe 3; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ nabíjacieho kábla: Adaptér; Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Iné